Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.38.080 and 2013 c 225 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The following sales of special fuel are exempt from payment of the tax imposed by this chapter:(a) Sales to the state of Washington, any county, or any municipality when the fuel is used for street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in motor vehicles owned and operated by the state, county, or municipality;(b) Sales for use in publicly owned firefighting equipment;(c) Sales to the United States government;(d) Sales to a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW when the fuel is for use in providing transportation services for persons with special transportation needs;(e) Sales of waste vegetable oil as defined under RCW 82.08.0205, if the oil is used to manufacture biodiesel;(f)(i) Sales to privately owned urban passenger transportation systems and carriers as defined in chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW. No exemption or refund may be granted for special fuel used by any privately owned urban transportation vehicle, or vehicle operated pursuant to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW, on any trip where any portion of the trip is more than ((twenty-five))25 road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in which the trip originated.(ii) For purposes of this subsection (1)(f), "privately owned urban passenger transportation system" means every privately owned transportation system having as its principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for compensation by means of motor vehicles or trackless trolleys, each having a seating capacity for over ((fifteen))15 persons over prescribed routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the same transportation system, do not extend for a distance exceeding ((twenty-five))25 road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in which the original starting points of such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys are located; ((and))(g)(i) Sales to publicly owned and operated urban passenger transportation systems.(ii) For the purposes of this subsection (1)(g), "publicly owned and operated urban passenger transportation systems" include public transportation benefit areas under chapter 36.57A RCW, metropolitan municipal corporations under chapter 36.56 RCW, city owned transit systems under chapter 35.58 RCW, county public transportation authorities under chapter 36.57 RCW, unincorporated transportation benefit areas under chapter 36.57 RCW, and regional transit authorities under chapter 81.112 RCW; and(h) Sales of special fuel or motor vehicle fuel to school districts for use in school buses operated in accordance with chapter 28A.160 RCW.(2) The following sales of motor vehicle fuel are exempt from payment of the tax imposed by this chapter:(a) Sales to the armed forces of the United States or to the national guard when the fuel is used exclusively in ships or for export from this state;(b) Sales to foreign diplomatic and consular missions, if the foreign government represented grants an equivalent exemption to missions and personnel of the United States performing similar services in the foreign country; and(c) Sales of fuel used exclusively for racing that is not legally allowed on the public highways of this state.Sec. 2. RCW 82.38.180 and 2013 c 225 s 119 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Any person who has purchased fuel on which tax has been paid may file a claim with the department for a refund of the tax for:(a) Fuel used for purposes other than for the propulsion of motor vehicles upon the public highways in this state. However, a refund may not be made for motor vehicle fuel consumed by a motor vehicle required to be registered under chapter 46.16A RCW.(b) Fuel exported for use outside of this state. Fuel carried from this state in the fuel tank of a motor vehicle is deemed to be exported from this state. Fuel distributed to a federally recognized Indian tribal reservation located within the state of Washington is not considered exported outside this state.(c) Tax, penalty, or interest erroneously or illegally collected or paid.(d) Fuel which is lost or destroyed, while the licensee is the owner thereof, through fire, lightning, flood, windstorm, or explosion.(e) Fuel of ((five hundred))500 gallons or more which is lost or destroyed while the licensee is the owner thereof, through leakage or other casualty except evaporation, shrinkage, or unknown causes.(f) Fuel used in power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any motor vehicle which is accurately measured by metering devices that have been specifically approved by the department or by a formula determined by the department.(2) Any person who has purchased special fuel on which tax has been paid may file a claim with the department for a refund of tax for:(a) Special fuel used for the operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to logging operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the boundaries of a federal area if the federal government requires a fee for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the proceeds of which are reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in the federal area, or requires maintenance or construction work to be performed on the highway for the privilege of operating the motor vehicle on the highway;(b) Special fuel used by special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;(c) Special fuel used in a motor vehicle for movement between two pieces of private property wherein the movement is incidental to the primary use of the vehicle; and(d) Special fuel inadvertently mixed with dyed special fuel.(3) Any person who has purchased motor vehicle fuel on which tax has been paid may file a claim with the department for a refund of tax for:(a) Motor vehicle fuel used by a private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW to provide transportation services for persons with special transportation needs; ((and))(b) Motor vehicle fuel used by an urban passenger transportation system. For purposes of this subsection "urban passenger transportation system" means every transportation system, publicly or privately owned, having as its principal source of revenue the income from transporting persons for compensation by means of motor vehicles or trackless trolleys, each having a seating capacity of over ((fifteen))15 persons, over prescribed routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys subject to the routing by the same transportation system, do not extend for a distance exceeding ((fifteen))15 road miles beyond the corporate limits of the city in which the original starting points of such motor vehicles or trackless trolleys are located. No refunds are authorized for fuel used on any trip where any portion of the trip is more than ((fifteen))15 road miles beyond the corporate limits of the city in which the trip originated; and(c) Special fuel or motor vehicle fuel used by school districts governed by chapter 28A.160 RCW.(4) Recovery for such loss or destruction under subsections (1)(d) or (e) or (2)(d) of this section must be susceptible to positive proof thereby enabling the department to conduct such investigation and require such information as it may deem necessary. In the event that the department is not satisfied that the fuel was lost, destroyed, or contaminated as claimed because information or proof as required hereunder is not sufficient to substantiate the accuracy of the claim, it may deem such as sufficient cause to deny all right relating to the refund or credit for the excise tax paid on fuel alleged to be lost or destroyed.(5) No refund or claim for credit may be approved by the department unless the gallons of fuel claimed as nontaxable satisfy the conditions specifically set forth in this section and the nontaxable event or use occurred during the period covered by the refund claim. Refunds or claims for credit are not ((be [are not])) allowed for anticipated nontaxable use or events.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 82.32.805 and 82.32.808 do not apply to section 1 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---